Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-114
Precinct, defined.

Precinct shall mean a defined area established by law within which all registered voters cast their votes at one polling place. Precinct may include any ward or other division of territory in any city or village when created and designated by ordinance for election purposes.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 14.